Vermont statutes. Title 26 Professions and Occupations
Subchapter 2. Board of Osteopathic Physicians and Surgeons

§ 1791.
Composition of the Board; qualifications; term of office.

A Board of Osteopathic Physicians and Surgeons is created. The Board shall consist of five members. Board members shall be appointed by the Governor pursuant to

3 V.S.A. §§ 129b

and 2004.

Three members of the Board shall be osteopathic physicians licensed and in good standing in this State who are graduates of an accredited school of osteopathic medicine and who reside and have resided and actively practiced osteopathic medicine in this State during the two years immediately preceding their appointments.
(b) (1) Three members of the Board shall be osteopathic physicians licensed and in good standing in this State who are graduates of an accredited school of osteopathic medicine and who reside and have resided and actively practiced osteopathic medicine in this State during the two years immediately preceding their appointments.

Two members shall be public members. A public member shall not have a financial interest personally or through a spouse, parent, child, brother, or sister in the activities regulated under this chapter, other than as a consumer or possible consumer of osteopathic medical services.

A majority of the members of the Board shall constitute a quorum, and all action shall be taken upon a majority vote of the members present and voting.

, (e)[Repealed.]

HISTORY:

Amended

1989, No. 253

(Adj. Sess.), § 5;

2005, No. 27

, § 48;

2015, No. 38

, § 16, eff. May 28, 2015.

§ 1792.
Powers; duties.

In addition to its other powers and duties, the Board shall:

Provide general information to applicants.

Explain appeal procedures to licensees and applicants and complaint procedures to the public.

Adopt rules that establish the activities that must be completed by an applicant in order to fulfill the experience requirements of this chapter. The rules shall require that the applicant’s experience be under the supervision of an osteopathic physician licensed under this chapter. Such activities shall be designed to ensure that all applicants acquire experience in critical areas of osteopathic medicine, but shall not limit admission to licensure unless there is good reason to believe that licensure of a particular applicant would be inconsistent with safeguarding the public welfare.

The Board may adopt rules necessary for the performance of its duties.

[Repealed.]

HISTORY:

Amended

1989, No. 253

(Adj. Sess.), § 6; amended

2015, No. 38

, § 17, eff. May 28, 2015.

§ 1793.
Repealed.
1989, No. 253 (Adj. Sess.), § 19.

§ 1794.
Fees.

Applicants and persons regulated under this chapter shall pay the following fees:

Application (A) Licensure $500.00 (B) Limited temporary license $ 50.00 (2) PARASTAT=“s” DESISTAT=“”>Biennial license renewal $300.00 (3) Annual limited temporary license renewal $100.00

Click to view

If at any time an assessment is imposed on the State for its membership in the Interstate Medical Licensure Compact Commission pursuant to section 1420m of this title, the Board and the Board of Medical Practice shall assume responsibility for paying the assessment from their respective special funds in proportional amounts based on their numbers of licensees for professions eligible for licensure through the Compact.

HISTORY:

Amended

1989, No. 253

(Adj. Sess.), § 7;

1991, No. 167

(Adj. Sess.), § 35;

1993, No. 108

(Adj. Sess.), § 18;

1997, No. 59

, § 57, eff. June 30, 1997;

1999, No. 49

, § 177;

2001, No. 143

(Adj. Sess.), § 27, eff. June 13, 2002;

2005, No. 202

(Adj. Sess.), § 16;

2011, No. 128

(Adj. Sess.), § 1;

2015, No. 57

, § 1;

2017, No. 115

(Adj. Sess.), § 3b, eff. Jan. 1, 2020;

2019, No. 178

(Adj. Sess.), § 10, eff. Oct. 1, 2020.